District of Columbia statutes.
28-4527

Rulemaking.

(a)

The Mayor may issue proposed rules, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, to implement the provisions of this chapter. The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution within this 45-day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved.

(b)

The Mayor may issue emergency rules, without prior Council approval, which shall be effective for not more than 90 days.

History

Mar. 22, 1994, D.C. Law 10-89, § 2(b), 41 DCR 489

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 28-4527.